Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1510
Interference with voter registration; penalty.

Any person who causes any breach of the peace or uses any disorderly violence or threat of violence which impedes or hinders any registration of voters or revision of voter registration lists or interferes with the lawful proceedings of any deputy registrar shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 409.